Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.020

License required—Use of "psychology" or similar terms. (Effective until October 1, 2025.)

(1) To safeguard the people of the state of Washington from the dangers of unqualified and improper practice of psychology, it is unlawful for any person to whom this chapter applies to represent himself or herself to be a psychologist without first obtaining a license as provided in this chapter.

(2) A person represents himself or herself to be a psychologist when the person adopts or uses any title or any description of services which incorporates one or more of the following terms: "psychology," "psychological," "psychologist," or any term of like import.

[ 1986 c 27 s 1; 1965 c 70 s 2; 1955 c 305 s 2.]

PDFRCW 18.83.020

License required—Use of "psychology" or similar terms—Associate disclosure form. (Effective October 1, 2025.)

(1) To safeguard the people of the state of Washington from the dangers of unqualified and improper practice of psychology, it is unlawful for any person to whom this chapter applies to represent himself or herself to be a psychologist or a licensed psychological associate without first obtaining a license as provided in this chapter.

(2) A person represents himself or herself to be a psychologist or a licensed psychological associate when the person adopts or uses any title or any description of services which incorporates one or more of the following terms: "psychology," "psychological," "psychologist," or any term of like import.

(3) A licensed psychological associate shall provide each client or patient, during the first professional contact, with a disclosure form disclosing that the licensed psychological associate is an associate under the supervision of an approved supervisor.

[ 2024 c 371 s 2; 1986 c 27 s 1; 1965 c 70 s 2; 1955 c 305 s 2.]

NOTES:

Rule making—2024 c 371 ss 1-16: "The examining board of psychology may adopt any rules necessary to implement sections 2 through 12 of this act. The secretary of health may adopt any rules necessary to implement sections 1 and 13 through 16 of this act." [ 2024 c 371 s 20.]

Effective dates—2024 c 371 ss 1-12, 14, and 16: See note following RCW 18.19.020.